Utah statutes.
71-8-2.   Department of Veterans' Affairs created -- Appointment of
executive director -- Department responsibilities.
(1)  There is created the Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(2)  The governor shall appoint an executive director for the department,
subject to Senate confirmation, from a list of qualified veterans provided by
the Veterans' Advisory Council.  Any veteran or veteran's group may submit
names to the council for consideration.
(3)  The department shall:
(a)  conduct and supervise all veteran activities as provided in this title;
and
(b)  adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, to carry out the provisions of this title.
